New Jersey, session 221, A3622.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, on or after the effective date of this act, all blanks, forms, documents, and applications furnished to the public for official business by every State department, commission, committee, council, or agency using the terms mother and father shall be replaced with blanks, forms, documents, and applications using the term parent or guardian. 2.    Pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the Secretary of State shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment.